Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 66. Review of the Activities of Agencies, Boards, and Commissions.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings related to this chapter, see § 1, ch. 149, SLA 1977.

Sec. 44.66.010.
Expiration of state boards and commissions.

Boards and commissions listed in this subsection expire on the date set out after each:

Alcoholic Beverage Control Board (AS

04.06.010

) — June 30, 2022;

Board of Parole (AS

33.16.020

) — June 30, 2025;

Regulatory Commission of Alaska (AS

42.04.010

) — June 30, 2022;

Alaska Commission on Aging (AS

47.45.200

) — June 30, 2024;

Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault (AS

18.66.010

) — June 30, 2022;

special education service agency (AS

14.30.600

) — June 30, 2029;

Statewide Suicide Prevention Council (AS

44.29.300

) — June 30, 2027;

Alaska Seismic Hazards Safety Commission (AS

44.37.065

) — June 30, 2028;

Alaska Health Care Commission (AS

18.09.010

) — June 30, 2017;

Citizens’ Advisory Commission on Federal Management Areas in Alaska (AS

41.37.160

) — June 30, 2021;

Alaska Tourism Marketing Board (AS

44.33.136

) — June 30, 2018;

Alaska Criminal Justice Commission (AS

44.19.641

) — June 30, 2021;

Marijuana Control Board (AS

17.38.080

) — June 30, 2024.

Upon termination, a commission listed in (a) of this section shall continue in existence until June 30 of the next succeeding year for the purpose of concluding its affairs.

A commission scheduled for termination under this chapter may be continued or reestablished by the legislature for a period not to exceed eight years.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, the powers and duties of the Regulatory Commission of Alaska in the year following expiration are not reduced or otherwise limited, and the commission shall continue in existence after expiration for one year. The commission shall continue to exercise all its powers and perform its duties and responsibilities under AS 42 during the year following its expiration.

History.

(am E.O. No. 48, § 5 (1981); am E.O. No. 105, § 3 (2003); § 3 ch 149 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 101 SLA 1978; am § 10 ch 179 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 44 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 115 SLA 1980; am § 11 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 11 ch 136 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 172 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 79 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 101 SLA 1981; am § 20 ch 110 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 65 SLA 1982; am § 31 ch 142 SLA 1982; am 1983 Initiative Proposal No. 2, § 6; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 52 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1983; am § 16 ch 161 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 163 SLA 1984; am § 63 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1985; am § 6 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 84 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 95 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 97 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 112 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 121 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 1987; am § 10 ch 78 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 1989; am § 6 ch 15 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 96 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 117 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 190 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 1992; am § 21 ch 6 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 15 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1994; am § 5 ch 44 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 109 SLA 1994; am § 10 ch 131 SLA 1994; am § 12 ch 1 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 1995; am § 33 ch 23 SLA 1995; am §§ 8, 9 ch 93 SLA 1995; am § 16 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 77 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 115 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 125 SLA 1998; am § 21 ch 25 SLA 1999; am § 10 ch 29 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1999; am § 18 ch 74 SLA 1999; am § 102 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 125 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 2001; am § 3 ch 84 SLA 2001; am §§ 5, 9 ch 2 TSSLA 2002; am § 3 ch 91 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 109 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 2003; am § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 127 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 2004; am § 27 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 2005; am § 5 ch 58 SLA 2005; am § 4 ch 71 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 2007; am § 4 ch 37 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 2008; am § 5 ch 43 SLA 2009; am § 3 ch 84 SLA 2010; am § 4 ch 96 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 2 FSSLA 2011; am §§ 5, 6 ch 23 SLA 2012; am § 2 ch 23 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 2014; am § 4 ch 76 SLA 2014; am § 33 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 9 ch 4 SLA 2015; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2015; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2016; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 2016; am § 167 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 2018; am § 3 ch 38 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 2019; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 2020; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 2020; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 2021)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted in 2002 as uncodified and codified in 2002, at which time “(b) of this section” was substituted for “AS

44.66.010(b)

” in subsection (d).

In 2004, the paragraphs in subsection (a) were renumbered to reflect the earlier repeals of paragraphs.

Paragraphs (a)(11) and (a)(12) were enacted as (a)(10); renumbered in 2014.

Cross references. —

For termination of boards regulating occupations and professions, see AS 08.03.

For provision declaring the limitation of (c) of this section inapplicable to the 2004 amendment of (a)(6) of this section extending the termination date of the special education service agency, see § 2, ch. 27, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For certification of underground storage tank workers, see 18 AAC 78, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, in (a)(13), substituted “June 30, 2024” for “June 30, 2018”.

The second 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, in (a)(1), substituted “June 30, 2022” for “June 30, 2018”.

The 2019 amendment, effective June 27, 2019, in (a)(7), substituted “June 30, 2027” for “June 30, 2019.”

The first 2020 amendment, effective April 21, 2020, in (a)(8), substituted “June 30, 2028” for “June 30, 2020”.

The second 2020 amendment, effective April 21, 2020, in (a)(2), substituted “June 30, 2025” for “June 30, 2020”.

The 2021 amendment, effective June 30, 2021, in (a)(6), substituted “June 30, 2029” for “June 30, 2021” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

Under § 8, ch. 23, SLA 2012, the 2012 amendment to (a)(1) of this section is retroactive to June 30, 2011.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The commission’s authority to make decisions and issue orders in accordance with the statutory powers and duties granted and conferred in AS 42.05, AS 42.06 and AS

42.45.100

et seq. is not withdrawn or diminished during the sunset (or wind-down) year. The commission should comply with the Sunset Law by preparing for the exigency of closing shop; this does not mean, however, that the commission cannot carry on its usual business of regulating utilities and pipelines. Since many of the commission’s statutory duties are mandatory, the commission must reconcile performance of those duties with the provisions of the Sunset Law. The commission should continue to perform its statutory duties to the extent possible while developing a plan to phase out its work by the close of the sunset year. In deciding how to do this, the commission has a considerable amount of discretion. June 21, 1994 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 44.66.020.
Agency programs.

Every year, the legislative audit division shall ensure that the review team conducts a performance review of the appropriate programs of the agencies listed in this subsection. Programs that are administered by more than one agency shall be reviewed with the agency that the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee designates. Reviews may be conducted before the dates set out in this subsection at the discretion of the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee. The first review shall occur in the calendar year set out after each agency’s name, as follows, and subsequent reviews of each agency, or part of an agency, shall occur every 10 years:

Department of Corrections, 2014;

Department of Health and Social Services, 2015;

Department of Education and Early Development, including the foundation formula, 2016;

Office of the Governor, 2017;

agencies of the legislative branch, 2017;

Alaska Court System, 2017;

University of Alaska, 2018;

Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, 2019;

Department of Administration, 2020;

Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, 2020;

Department of Fish and Game, 2021;

Department of Environmental Conservation, 2021;

Department of Natural Resources, 2021;

Department of Revenue, 2022;

Department of Law, 2022;

Department of Public Safety, 2022;

Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs, 2023;

Department of Labor and Workforce Development, 2023.

Subject to appropriation, the legislative audit division shall hire individuals and contract with individuals or firms to form a review team or teams to complete the reviews under this section.

In the year before the year designated as the year for review in (a) of this section, the agency shall provide to the review team, before November 1,

citations to the agency’s authority under the Constitution of the State of Alaska or the Alaska Statutes to administer its programs;

a list of programs or elements of programs that compose at least 10 percent of the general funds in the agency’s budget appropriated from the general fund that could be reduced or eliminated; the agency shall consider first those programs or elements of programs that

do not serve a current need;

are not authorized by the Constitution of the State of Alaska or the Alaska Statutes; or

are not essential to the agency mission or delivery of the agency’s core services;

a list of active encumbrances and an explanation of the continuing need for any encumbrance unsatisfied more than one year after it was incurred;

all information submitted to the legislature in the agency’s most recent submission under AS

37.07.050

, including agency mission, results-based measures, prioritization of core services, and all programs within the core services from the most important to the least important.

History.

(§ 3 ch 149 SLA 1977; am § 14 ch 31 SLA 2005; am § 5 ch 19 SLA 2013)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under sec. 11, ch. 19, SLA 2013, this section is repealed July 1, 2023.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section, setting out in greater detail the agency programs subject to termination during the regular legislative session, and the procedure for review.

Sec. 44.66.030.
Program identification. [Repealed, § 10 ch 19 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 44.66.040.
Duties of the review team.

During a review year set out in AS

44.66.020(a)

, the legislative audit division shall determine the scope of the performance review subject to approval by the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee, and the review team shall

collaborate with the legislative audit division and the legislative finance division to identify any earlier audit findings or budgetary issues for the agency;

through the Legislative Budget and Audit committee or the senate or house finance committees of the state legislature, schedule public hearings in Juneau, Anchorage, Fairbanks, and other locations as determined by the committees to review agency activities and identify problems or concerns;

consult with other states and appropriate public policy organizations to establish best practices for the agency;

analyze the agency priorities reported to the legislature under AS

37.07.050(a)(13)

; and

evaluate the agency process for development of capital projects.

The review team shall analyze materials relevant to the performance of the agency, including

all material provided under AS

44.66.020(c)(4)

;

a 10-year growth history and a 10-year projection of agency expenses by funding source, prepared by the office of management and budget;

organizational charts, personnel charts by location that show the number of positions and the functions of each position, and a list of transfers of personal services funding to or from other line items within the agency during the preceding 10 years, prepared by the office of management and budget;

audit information, including a list of agency audit recommendations, prepared by the legislative audit division;

a list of any financial issues relating to the agency’s operating or capital expenditures, prepared by the legislative finance division;

an explanation of the function and procedure for dedicated funds or any other special funds in the agency, prepared by the legislative finance division;

a 10-year history of any budget ratifications or supplemental budget requests, prepared by the legislative finance division; and

analysis and summary of confidential information that the review team may request, through the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee, from the legislative audit division, if necessary to complete the team’s review.

Before December 16 of the review year set out in AS

44.66.020(a)

, the review team shall provide a confidential preliminary report to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee.

One week before the first day of the regular session of the legislature in the year following the review year set out in AS

44.66.020(a)

, the review team shall provide to the chairs or cochairs of the senate and house finance committees a final report. In the report, the review team may

evaluate the success of the agency in achieving its mission through the effective and efficient delivery of its core services, goals, programs, and objectives;

determine whether the agency’s results-based measures demonstrate the effectiveness and efficiency of the agency’s core services, goals, programs, and objectives and recommend changes if necessary;

determine whether the results-based measures were useful in conducting the review and recommend changes if necessary;

evaluate the appropriateness of the budget reductions proposed under AS

44.66.020(c)

;

determine whether the agency acted in good faith to correct problems identified in any previous audit or review;

list agency programs or actions not authorized by statute and identify other authority for those actions;

identify agency authority to collect fees, conduct inspections, enforce state law, or impose penalties;

recommend improvements to agency practices and procedures, including means to decrease regulatory burdens or restrictions without decreasing public service and safety;

identify areas in which programs and jurisdiction of agencies overlap and assess the quality of interagency cooperation in those areas;

evaluate whether the agency promptly and effectively addresses complaints;

evaluate to what extent the agency encourages and uses public participation in rulemaking and other decision making;

evaluate the agency’s process for implementing technology and recommend new types or uses of technology to improve agency efficiency and effectiveness;

identify services provided by programs and functions duplicated by another government agency or private entity and recommend the most effective and efficient way to perform those services;

evaluate whether the agency priorities reported to the legislature under AS

37.07.050(a)(13)

and the list of programs or elements of programs provided under AS

44.66.020(c)(2)

are consistent with the results of the performance review;

identify agencies that could be terminated or consolidated, reductions in costs, and potential program or cost reductions based on policy changes;

identify reductions and efficiencies recommended as a result of a review conducted under this section;

identify the extent to which statutory, regulatory, budgetary, or other changes are necessary to enable the agency to better serve the interests of the public and to correct problems identified during the review;

analyze how the review team’s recommendation to terminate the agency or to terminate any program within the agency would affect federal funding or instigate federal intervention;

include draft legislation to correct problems identified in the report that shall be introduced by the senate and house finance committees of the state legislature during the current legislative session;

identify areas that need in-depth review in order to provide complete information to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee for consideration in the audit process; and

identify any other elements appropriate to a performance management review.

The Legislative Budget and Audit Committee shall, based on the amount of the actual reduction in state expenditures reported by the legislative finance division under AS

24.20.231

(7) increased by an appropriate inflationary factor to be determined by the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee, estimate the anticipated savings for the second through fifth fiscal years following the review. The Legislative Budget and Audit Committee shall include the amount of the actual reduction and the anticipated future savings in its annual report under AS

24.20.311

for the second fiscal year following the review and each of the subsequent four reports.

The senate and house finance committee chairs, cochairs, and subcommittees may incorporate the recommendations of a report submitted under (d) of this section into the budget for the fiscal year following the report.

History.

(§ 6 ch 19 SLA 2013)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under sec. 11, ch. 19, SLA 2013, this section is repealed July 1, 2023.

Effective dates. —

Section 12, ch. 19, SLA 2013 makes this section effective July 1, 2013.

Sec. 44.66.050.
Legislative oversight.

Before the termination, dissolution, continuation, or reestablishment of a board or commission under AS

08.03.010

or AS

44.66.010

, a committee of reference of each house, which shall be the standing committee of legislative jurisdiction as provided in the Uniform Rules of the Legislature, shall hold one or more hearings to receive testimony from the public, the commissioner of the department having administrative responsibility for each named board or commission, and the members of the board or commission involved. The hearings may be joint hearings. The committee shall also consider the proposed budget of the board or commission prepared in accordance with AS

37.07.050(f)

and the performance audit of the activities of the board or commission prepared by the legislative audit division as prescribed in AS

24.20.271

(1). The committee may consider any other report of the activities of the board or commission, including annual reports, summaries prepared by the Legislative Affairs Agency, and any evaluation or general report of the manner of conduct of activities of the board or commission prepared by the office of the ombudsman.

During a public hearing, the board or commission shall have the burden of demonstrating a public need for its continued existence or the continuation of the program and the extent to which any change in the manner of exercise of its functions or activities may increase efficiency of administration or operation consistent with the public interest.

A determination as to whether a board or commission has demonstrated a public need for its continued existence must take into consideration the following factors:

the extent to which the board or commission has operated in the public interest;

the extent to which the operation of the board or commission has been impeded or enhanced by existing statutes, procedures, and practices that it has adopted, and any other matter, including budgetary, resource, and personnel matters;

the extent to which the board or commission has recommended statutory changes that are generally of benefit to the public interest;

the extent to which the board or commission has encouraged interested persons to report to it concerning the effect of its regulations and decisions on the effectiveness of service, economy of service, and availability of service that it has provided;

the extent to which the board or commission has encouraged public participation in the making of its regulations and decisions;

the efficiency with which public inquiries or complaints regarding the activities of the board or commission filed with it, with the department to which a board or commission is administratively assigned, or with the office of victims’ rights or the office of the ombudsman have been processed and resolved;

the extent to which a board or commission that regulates entry into an occupation or profession has presented qualified applicants to serve the public;

the extent to which state personnel practices, including affirmative action requirements, have been complied with by the board or commission in its own activities and in the area of activity or interest;

the extent to which statutory, regulatory, budgetary, or other changes are necessary to enable the board or commission to better serve the interests of the public and to comply with the factors enumerated in this subsection;

the extent to which the board or commission has effectively attained its objectives and purposes and the efficiency with which the board or commission has operated; and

the extent to which the board or commission duplicates the activities of another governmental agency or the private sector.

As to each board or commission assigned to it for purposes of review, the committee of reference shall, not later than the 60th day of the legislative session, submit a report to the presiding officer of the house. The report must contain a summary of the findings of the committee as to the compliance of the board or commission with the factors enumerated in (c) of this section, together with a summary or recommendations of the committee as to each of the following:

an identification of the problems or the needs that the programs and activities of the board or commission are intended to address;

a statement, to the extent practicable, of the objectives of the program of the board or commission and its anticipated accomplishments;

an identification of any other programs having similar, conflicting, or duplicate objectives;

an assessment of alternative methods of achieving the purposes of the program;

an assessment of the consequences of eliminating the board or commission and consolidating its activities with another program or of funding it at a lower level;

a justification for the recommended continuation or extension of the board or commission and an explanation of the manner in which it avoids duplication of or conflict with other efforts; and

any other information that, in the opinion of the committee, would improve the performance of the board or commission with respect to its representation of and responsiveness to the public interest.

The committee of reference may introduce a bill providing for the reorganization or continuation of the board or commission. Not more than one board or commission may be continued or reestablished in any legislative bill, and the board or commission must be mentioned in the title of the bill.

History.

(§ 3 ch 149 SLA 1977; am § 31 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 6 ch 58 SLA 2005; am § 7 ch 19 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For temporary law provision exempting ch. 23, SLA 2012 from the provision of (e) of this section prohibiting a bill from continuing or reestablishing more than one board or commission, see § 7, ch. 23, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in the first sentence of (a), deleted “or of an agency program under AS

44.66.020

and AS

44.66.030

” following “under AS

08.03.010

or AS

44.66.010

”; and, throughout the section, deleted references to “agency program” or similar, and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 44.66.060.
Existing claims.

This chapter does not cause the termination or dismissal of a claim or right of a citizen against a board, commission, or program of an agency terminated by legislative action or under this chapter that is subject to litigation. Claims and rights shall be assumed by the department to which the board or commission terminated under this chapter was attached for administrative purposes.

History.

(§ 3 ch 149 SLA 1977; am § 8 ch 19 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, inserted “by legislative action or” following “program of an agency terminated”.

Sec. 44.66.070.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“agency” means a state department or agency, whether in the legislative, judicial, or executive branch, and includes the University of Alaska;

“review team” means appropriate professionals hired by or under contract with the legislative audit division to complete a performance review under AS

44.66.020

—

44.66.040

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 19 SLA 2013)

Delayed repeal of paragraph (2). —

Under sec. 11, ch. 19, SLA 2013, paragraph (2) of this section is repealed July 1, 2023.

Effective dates. —

Section 12, ch. 19, SLA 2013 makes this section effective July 1, 2013.